ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы электроснабжения > Преобразователи мощности: Понижающие преобразователи; Повышающие преобразователи
tr: Hırdavat > Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri > Güç Dönüştürücüler: Alçaltıcı Dönüştürücüler; Yükseltici Dönüştürücüler
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 电动/电气用品 > 交流-直流转换器: 降压转换器; 升压转换器
hu: Hardver > Tápellátás és elektromos kellékek > Teljesítményátalakítók: Feszültségcsökkentő átalakítók; Feszültségnövelő átalakítók
pt-BR: Ferragens > Suprimentos elétricos > Conversores de potência: Conversores de redução; Conversores de aumento
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały elektryczne > Przetwornice napięcia: Przetwornice obniżające napięcie; Przetwornice podwyższające napięcie
es: Bricolaje > Suministros eléctricos > Conversores de potencia: Conversores reductores; Conversores elevadores
ja: DIY用品 > 電力供給装置 > AC-DCコンバーター: 降圧コンバーター; 昇圧コンバーター
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ไฟฟ้า > เครื่องแปลงกระแสไฟฟ้า: ตัวแปลงลดแรงดัน; ตัวแปลงเพิ่มแรงดัน
hr-HR: Željezarija > Elektroinstalacijska oprema > Pretvarači napona: Silazni pretvarači; Uzlazni pretvarači
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Napajanje in električna oprema > Pretvorniki napetosti: Pretvorniki za postopno zmanjševanje napajanja; Pretvorniki za postopno povečevanje napajanja
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Elektros reikmenys > Maitinimo keitikliai: Įtampos mažinimo keitikliai; Įtampos didinimo keitikliai
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires électriques > Convertisseurs électriques: Convertisseurs abaisseurs; Convertisseurs élévateurs
vi: Phần cứng > Nguồn & Cấp điện > Bộ chuyển đổi điện: Bộ giảm điện áp; Bộ tăng điện áp
fi: Rakentaminen > Teholähteet ja sähkötarvikkeet > Virtamuuntimet: Madaltavat muuntimet; Korottavat muuntimet
en: Hardware > Power & Electrical Supplies > Power Converters: Step-Down Converters; Step-Up Converters
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Elektroinstalace > Měniče napětí: Step-down měniče; Step-up měniče
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Forniture elettriche > Convertitori di potenza: Convertitori step-down; Convertitori step-up
sv: Metallprodukter > Eltillbehör > Strömkonverterare: Nedåtkonverterare; Uppåtkonverterare
ko: 철물 > 전원/전기 용품 > 전력 변환 장치: 강압 변환 장치; 승압 변환 장치
nb: Maskinvare > Strøm- og elektrisk utstyr > Strømkonvertere: Step-Down-konvertere; Step-Up-konvertere
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden > Voedingsconverters: Step-downconverters; Step-upconverters
zh-TW: 硬體 > 供電用品 > 電源轉換器: 降壓轉換器; 升壓轉換器
ro-RO: Feronerie > Articole și consumabile de alimentare și electrice > Convertoare de putere: Convertoare de reducție; Convertoare de ridicare a tensiunii
pt-PT: Equipamento > Artigos de potência e alimentação elétrica > Conversores de potência: Conversores abaixadores; Conversores elevadores
da: Isenkram > Eludstyr > Strøm – omformere: Step-down-omformere; Step-up-omformere
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Elektrobedarf > Schaltnetzteile: Abwärtswandler; Aufwärtswandler
bg-BG: Железария > Захранване и електрически консумативи > Конвертори на напрежение: Понижаващи конвертори на напрежение; Повишаващи конвертори на напрежение
sk-SK: Náradie > Dodávka elektrickej energie > Elektrické meniče: Znižovače napätia; Zvyšovače napätia
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Παροχή ρεύματος & ηλεκτρικά εξαρτήματα > Μετατροπείς ισχύος: Μετατροπείς υποβιβασμού; Μετατροπείς ανύψωσης